Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2045
Visiting faculty permit; issuance; conditions.

A visiting faculty permit may be issued to graduates of foreign schools or colleges of medicine or to individuals if an accredited college or school of medicine in the State of Nebraska has requested that such permit be issued. It shall not be necessary for such applicant to provide a certificate of the Educational Commission on Foreign Medical Graduates as required in the case of temporary educational permits. If directed by the department an applicant for a visiting faculty permit may be required to pass an examination approved by the board to measure his or her clinical competence to practice medicine and if such examination is required the applicant shall pay the required fee.

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 16;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 435;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 91;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 42;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.14;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 703.